Hawaii statutes.
§199-2 Board of land and natural resources,
delegation of authority. The board of land and natural resources may
delegate to enforcement officers within the conservation and resources
enforcement program, such authority as may be required for enforcement of title
12, chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K, and rules adopted thereunder. [L 1978, c 171, pt
of §1; am L 2004, c 142, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next